Utah statutes.
20A-5-705.   Officer or watcher revealing vote.

(1)  It is unlawful for any election official or watcher to reveal to any other person the name of any candidate for whom a voter has voted, or to communicate to another his opinion, belief, or impression as to how or for whom a voter has voted.

(2)  Any election official or watcher who violates this section is guilty of a class A misdemeanor and shall be imprisoned for not less than six months, and fined not less than $250.



Enacted by Chapter 1, 1993 General Session

